Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA'S RALLY TO READ.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Children, Youth, and Families in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rally to Read. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Minnesota's Rally to Read: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) Grant money must be used to support community reading coalitions throughout the state that work toward making Minnesota the state with the highest reading proficiency scores and the fewest inequities, with a focus on optimizing every child's brain development during the crucial years of prenatal to age three. Appropriate uses of grant money may include but are not limited to staffing to coordinate statewide implementation, community reading coalition facilitation, meeting expenses, data tracking, benchmark dashboard monitoring, and evaluation. new text end new text begin (c) Rally to Read must implement a targeted strategy to prioritize delivering literacy resources to the children who need it the most. The community reading coalitions must build on existing programs that have a proven track record of delivering results that benefit children to ensure children are prepared to read by age three and are able to read proficiently at every grade level. new text end new text begin (d) Each dollar of grant money received must be matched with private money. new text end new text begin (e) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end